Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2783.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 STATE GOVERNMENT APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the general fund, or another named fund, and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin LEGISLATUREnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 114,268,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 114,389,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Senate new text end new text begin 38,953,000 new text end new text begin 38,953,000 new text end new text begin The base for this appropriation is $39,703,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin House of Representatives new text end new text begin 42,375,000 new text end new text begin 41,162,000 new text end new text begin The base for this appropriation is $39,437,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $39,436,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Legislative Coordinating Commission new text end new text begin 32,940,000 new text end new text begin 34,274,000 new text end new text begin The base for this appropriation is $34,283,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $34,284,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin new text begin Legislative Auditor.new text end $12,654,000 the first year and $13,147,000 the second year are for the Office of the Legislative Auditor. new text end new text begin new text begin Revisor of Statutes.new text end $9,388,000 the first year and $9,769,000 the second year are for the Office of the Revisor of Statutes. new text end new text begin new text begin Legislative Reference Library.new text end $2,278,000 the first year and $2,369,000 the second year are for the Legislative Reference Library. new text end new text begin new text begin Legislative Budget Office.new text end $2,800,000 the first year and $2,965,000 the second year are for the Legislative Budget Office. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin GOVERNOR AND LIEUTENANT GOVERNORnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 9,231,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 9,231,000 new text end new text begin (a) $19,000 each year is for necessary expenses in the normal performance of the governor's and lieutenant governor's duties for which no other reimbursement is provided. new text end new text begin (b) By September 1 of each year, the commissioner of management and budget shall report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over state government finance any personnel costs incurred by the Offices of the Governor and Lieutenant Governor that were supported by appropriations to other agencies during the previous fiscal year. The Office of the Governor shall inform the chairs and ranking minority members of the committees before initiating any interagency agreements. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin STATE AUDITORnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 15,497,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 16,101,000 new text end new text begin The base for this appropriation is $16,034,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $16,064,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin ATTORNEY GENERALnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 48,854,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 48,237,000 new text end new text begin The general fund base for this appropriation is $44,821,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $44,462,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 45,438,000 new text end new text begin 44,821,000 new text end new text begin State Government Special Revenue new text end new text begin 3,021,000 new text end new text begin 3,021,000 new text end new text begin Environmental new text end new text begin 145,000 new text end new text begin 145,000 new text end new text begin Remediation new text end new text begin 250,000 new text end new text begin 250,000 new text end Sec. 6. new text begin SECRETARY OF STATEnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 13,120,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 13,004,000 new text end new text begin The base for this appropriation is $12,934,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $13,004,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin STATE BOARD OF INVESTMENTnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 139,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 139,000 new text end Sec. 8. new text begin ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 11,110,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 11,709,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 705,000 new text end new text begin 715,000 new text end new text begin Workers' Compensation new text end new text begin 10,405,000 new text end new text begin 10,994,000 new text end Sec. 9. new text begin INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICESnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 10,153,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 10,172,000 new text end new text begin The base for this appropriation is $10,222,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter. new text end new text begin During the biennium ending June 30, 2027, the Department of Information Technology Services must not charge fees to a public noncommercial educational television broadcast station eligible for funding under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 129D, for access to the state broadcast infrastructure. If the access fees not charged to public noncommercial educational television broadcast stations total more than $400,000 for the biennium, the office may charge for access fees in excess of these amounts. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin ADMINISTRATIONnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 36,976,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 36,985,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Government and Citizen Services new text end new text begin 17,067,000 new text end new text begin 17,075,000 new text end new text begin The general fund base for this appropriation is $17,131,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter. new text end new text begin Council on Developmental Disabilities. $222,000 each year is for the Council on Developmental Disabilities. new text end new text begin State Agency Accommodation Reimbursement. $200,000 each year may be transferred to the accommodation account established in Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.4805. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Strategic Management Services new text end new text begin 2,639,000 new text end new text begin 2,639,000 new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Fiscal Agent new text end new text begin 17,270,000 new text end new text begin 17,271,000 new text end new text begin The appropriations under this subdivision are to the commissioner of administration for the purposes specified. new text end new text begin In Lieu of Rent. $12,566,000 the first year and $12,567,000 the second year are for space costs of the legislature and veterans organizations, ceremonial space, and statutorily free space. new text end new text begin Public Television. (a) $1,550,000 each year is for matching grants for public television. new text end new text begin (b) $250,000 each year is for public television equipment grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 129D.13. new text end new text begin (c) $500,000 each year is for block grants to public television under Minnesota Statutes, section 129D.13. Of this amount, up to three percent is for the commissioner of administration to administer the grants. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner of administration must consider the recommendations of the Minnesota Public Television Association before allocating the amounts appropriated in paragraphs (a) and (b) for equipment or matching grants. new text end new text begin Public Radio. (a) $1,242,000 each year is for community service grants to public educational radio stations. This appropriation may be used to disseminate emergency information in foreign languages. Any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available for the second year. The Association of Minnesota Public Educational Radio Stations may use up to four percent of this appropriation to help the organization and its member stations to better serve Minnesota's communities. new text end new text begin (b) $142,000 each year is for equipment grants to public educational radio stations. This appropriation may be used for the repair, rental, purchase, and upgrade of equipment and software, including computer software, applications, firmware, and equipment under $500. new text end new text begin (c) $1,020,000 each year is for equipment grants to Minnesota Public Radio, Inc., including upgrades to Minnesota's Emergency Alert and AMBER Alert Systems. new text end new text begin (d) The appropriations in paragraphs (a) to (c) may not be used for indirect costs claimed by an institution or governing body. new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner of administration must consider the recommendations of the Association of Minnesota Public Educational Radio Stations before awarding grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 129D.14, using the appropriations in paragraphs (a) to (c). No grantee is eligible for a grant unless they are a member of the Association of Minnesota Public Educational Radio Stations on or before July 1, 2023. new text end new text begin (f) Any unencumbered balance remaining the first year for grants to public television or public radio stations does not cancel and is available for the second year. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin CAPITOL AREA ARCHITECTURAL AND PLANNING BOARDnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 464,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 472,000 new text end Sec. 12. new text begin MINNESOTA MANAGEMENT AND BUDGETnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 52,181,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 52,181,000 new text end new text begin The general fund base for this appropriation is $52,206,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin REVENUEnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 216,916,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 213,918,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 212,656,000 new text end new text begin 209,658,000 new text end new text begin Health Care Access new text end new text begin 1,760,000 new text end new text begin 1,760,000 new text end new text begin Highway User Tax Distribution new text end new text begin 2,195,000 new text end new text begin 2,195,000 new text end new text begin Environmental new text end new text begin 305,000 new text end new text begin 305,000 new text end new text begin The general fund base for this appropriation is $209,657,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $209,558,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Tax System Management new text end new text begin 181,937,000 new text end new text begin 179,013,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 177,677,000 new text end new text begin 174,753,000 new text end new text begin Health Care Access new text end new text begin 1,760,000 new text end new text begin 1,760,000 new text end new text begin Highway User Tax Distribution new text end new text begin 2,195,000 new text end new text begin 2,195,000 new text end new text begin Environmental new text end new text begin 305,000 new text end new text begin 305,000 new text end new text begin Taxpayer Assistance and Tax Credit Outreach Grants. (a) $1,750,000 each year is for taxpayer assistance grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 270C.21, subdivision 3. The unencumbered balance in the first year does not cancel but is available for the second year. new text end new text begin (b) $1,000,000 each year is for tax credit outreach grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 270C.21, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Debt Collection Management new text end new text begin 34,979,000 new text end new text begin 34,905,000 new text end Sec. 14. new text begin GAMBLING CONTROL BOARDnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 6,334,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 6,334,000 new text end new text begin These appropriations are from the lawful gambling regulation account in the special revenue fund. new text end Sec. 15. new text begin RACING COMMISSIONnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 954,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 954,000 new text end new text begin These appropriations are from the racing and card playing regulation accounts in the special revenue fund. new text end Sec. 16. new text begin STATE LOTTERYnew text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 349A.10, subdivision 3, the State Lottery's operating budget must not exceed $45,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $45,000,000 in fiscal year 2027. new text end Sec. 17. new text begin AMATEUR SPORTS COMMISSIONnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 401,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 411,000 new text end Sec. 18. new text begin COUNCIL FOR MINNESOTANS OF AFRICAN HERITAGEnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 828,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 840,000 new text end Sec. 19. new text begin COUNCIL ON LATINO AFFAIRSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 693,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 705,000 new text end Sec. 20. new text begin COUNCIL ON ASIAN-PACIFIC MINNESOTANSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 655,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 665,000 new text end Sec. 21. new text begin INDIAN AFFAIRS COUNCILnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,381,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,402,000 new text end Sec. 22. new text begin COUNCIL ON LGBTQIA2S+ MINNESOTANSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 607,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 615,000 new text end Sec. 23. new text begin MINNESOTA HISTORICAL SOCIETYnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 26,813,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 27,126,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Operations and Programs new text end new text begin 26,442,000 new text end new text begin 26,755,000 new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 138.668, the Minnesota Historical Society may not charge a fee for its general tours at the Capitol, but may charge fees for special programs other than general tours. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Fiscal Agent new text end new text begin 371,000 new text end new text begin 371,000 new text end new text begin (a) Global Minnesota new text end new text begin 39,000 new text end new text begin 39,000 new text end new text begin (b) Minnesota Air National Guard Museum new text end new text begin 17,000 new text end new text begin 17,000 new text end new text begin (c) Hockey Hall of Fame new text end new text begin 100,000 new text end new text begin 100,000 new text end new text begin (d) Farmamerica new text end new text begin 165,000 new text end new text begin 165,000 new text end new text begin (e) Minnesota Military Museum new text end new text begin 50,000 new text end new text begin 50,000 new text end new text begin Any unencumbered balance remaining in this subdivision the first year does not cancel but is available for the second year of the biennium. new text end Sec. 24. new text begin BOARD OF THE ARTSnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 7,798,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 7,808,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Operations and Services new text end new text begin 859,000 new text end new text begin 869,000 new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Grants Program new text end new text begin 4,800,000 new text end new text begin 4,800,000 new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Regional Arts Councils new text end new text begin 2,139,000 new text end new text begin 2,139,000 new text end new text begin Any unencumbered balance remaining in this section the first year does not cancel, but is available for the second year. new text end new text begin Money appropriated in this section and distributed as grants may only be spent on projects located in Minnesota. A recipient of a grant funded by an appropriation in this section must not use more than ten percent of the total grant for costs related to travel outside the state of Minnesota. new text end Sec. 25. new text begin MINNESOTA HUMANITIES CENTERnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 970,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 970,000 new text end new text begin $500,000 each year is for Healthy Eating, Here at Home grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 138.912. No more than three percent of the appropriation may be used for the nonprofit administration of the program. new text end Sec. 26. new text begin BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCYnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 873,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 887,000 new text end Sec. 27. new text begin BOARD OF ARCHITECTURE, ENGINEERING, LAND SURVEYING, LANDSCAPE ARCHITECTURE, GEOSCIENCE, AND INTERIOR DESIGNnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 928,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 943,000 new text end Sec. 28. new text begin BOARD OF COSMETOLOGIST EXAMINERSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 3,654,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 3,711,000 new text end Sec. 29. new text begin BOARD OF BARBER EXAMINERSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 459,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 466,000 new text end Sec. 30. new text begin CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES.new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 55,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $55,000 the first year is to integrate the transit assistance program into the MNbenefits web portal under article 2, section 20. new text end Sec. 31. new text begin GENERAL CONTINGENT ACCOUNTSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,000,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 1,500,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin State Government Special Revenue new text end new text begin 400,000 new text end new text begin 400,000 new text end new text begin Workers' Compensation new text end new text begin 100,000 new text end new text begin 100,000 new text end new text begin (a) The general fund base for this appropriation is $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each even-numbered fiscal year thereafter. The base is $0 for fiscal year 2029 and each odd-numbered fiscal year thereafter. new text end new text begin (b) The appropriations in this section may only be spent with the approval of the governor after consultation with the Legislative Advisory Commission pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, section 3.30. new text end new text begin (c) If an appropriation in this section for either year is insufficient, the appropriation for the other year is available for it. new text end Sec. 32. new text begin TORT CLAIMSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 161,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 161,000 new text end new text begin These appropriations are to be spent by the commissioner of management and budget according to Minnesota Statutes, section 3.736, subdivision 7. If an appropriation in this section for either year is insufficient, the appropriation for the other year is available for it. new text end Sec. 33. new text begin MINNESOTA STATE RETIREMENT SYSTEMnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 15,064,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 15,154,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Combined Legislators and Constitutional Officers Retirement Plan new text end new text begin 9,064,000 new text end new text begin 9,154,000 new text end new text begin Under Minnesota Statutes, sections 3A.03, subdivision 2; 3A.04, subdivisions 3 and 4; and 3A.115. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Judges Retirement Plan new text end new text begin 6,000,000 new text end new text begin 6,000,000 new text end new text begin The appropriations for this subdivision are for transfer to the judges retirement fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 490.123. This transfer continues each fiscal year until the judges retirement plan reaches 100 percent funding as determined by an actuarial valuation prepared according to Minnesota Statutes, section 356.214. new text end Sec. 34. new text begin PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT ASSOCIATIONnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 25,000,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 25,000,000 new text end new text begin (a) $9,000,000 each year is for direct state aid to the public employees police and fire retirement plan authorized under Minnesota Statutes, section 353.65, subdivision 3b. new text end new text begin (b) State payments from the general fund to the Public Employees Retirement Association on behalf of the former MERF division account are $16,000,000 on September 15, 2026, and $16,000,000 on September 15, 2027. These amounts are estimated to be needed under Minnesota Statutes, section 353.505. new text end Sec. 35. new text begin TEACHERS RETIREMENT ASSOCIATIONnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 29,831,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 29,831,000 new text end new text begin The amounts estimated to be needed are as follows. new text end new text begin Special Direct State Aid. $27,331,000 each year is for special direct state aid authorized under Minnesota Statutes, section 354.436. new text end new text begin Special Direct State Matching Aid. $2,500,000 each year is for special direct state matching aid authorized under Minnesota Statutes, section 354.435. new text end Sec. 36. new text begin ST. PAUL TEACHERS RETIREMENT FUNDnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 14,827,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 14,827,000 new text end new text begin The amounts estimated to be needed for special direct state aid to the first class city teachers retirement fund association authorized under Minnesota Statutes, section 354A.12, subdivisions 3a and 3c. new text end Sec. 37. Laws 2023, chapter 62, article 1, section 11, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Government and Citizen Services 39,928,000 19,943,000 The base for this appropriation is $17,268,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $17,280,000 in fiscal year 2027. Council on Developmental Disabilities. $222,000 each year is for the Council on Developmental Disabilities. State Agency Accommodation Reimbursement. $200,000 each year may be transferred to the accommodation account established in Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.4805. Disparity Study. $500,000 the first year and $1,000,000 the second year are to conduct a study on disparities in state procurement. This is a onetime appropriation. Grants Administration Oversight. $2,411,000 the first year and $1,782,000 the second year are for grants administration oversight. The base for this appropriation in fiscal year 2026 and each year thereafter is $1,581,000. $735,000 the first year and $201,000 the second year are for a study to develop a road map on the need for an enterprise grants management system and to implement the study's recommendation. This is a onetime appropriation. Risk Management Fund Property Self-Insurance. $12,500,000 the first year is for transfer to the risk management fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.85. This is a onetime appropriation. Office of Enterprise Translations. $1,306,000 the first year and $1,159,000 the second year are to establish the Office of Enterprise Translations. $250,000 each year may be transferred to the language access service account established in Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.373. Capitol Mall Design Framework Implementation. $5,000,000 the first year is to implement the updated Capitol Mall Design Framework, prioritizing the framework plans identified in article 2, section 124. This appropriation is available until deleted text begin December 31, 2024deleted text end new text begin June 30, 2026new text end . Parking Fund. $3,255,000 the first year and $1,085,000 the second year are for a transfer to the state parking account to maintain the operations of the parking and transit program on the Capitol complex. These are onetime transfers. Procurement; Environmental Analysis and Task Force. $522,000 the first year and $367,000 the second year are to implement the provisions of Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.312. Center for Rural Policy and Development. $100,000 the first year is for a grant to the Center for Rural Policy and Development. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively from July 1, 2024. new text end Sec. 38. Laws 2023, chapter 62, article 1, section 47, is amended to read: Sec. 47. ST. ANTHONY FALLS STUDY. $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for a geophysical study and hazard assessment of the St. Anthony Falls area and St. Anthony Falls cutoff wall. The study must include a field-based investigation of the cutoff wall and other subsurface structures, modeling of the surrounding area, examination of public safety and infrastructure risks posed by potential failure of the cutoff wall or surrounding area, and emergency response plan for identified risks. By conducting this study, the Board of Regents does not consent to accepting liability for the current condition or risks posed by a potential failure of the cutoff wall. By July 1, deleted text begin 2025deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end , the Board of Regents must submit a report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over state and local government policy and finance. This appropriation is available until June 30, deleted text begin 2025deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 39. Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 67, section 6, is amended to read: Sec. 6. COMMISSIONER OF MANAGEMENT AND BUDGET Appropriations by Fund 2024 2025 General -0- (232,000) Health Care Access -0- 100,000 (a) Insulin safety net program. $100,000 in fiscal year 2025 is from the health care access fund for the insulin safety net program in Minnesota Statutes, section 151.74. (b) Transfer. The commissioner must transfer from the health care access fund to the insulin deleted text begin safety net programdeleted text end new text begin repaymentnew text end account in the special revenue fund the amount certified by the commissioner of administration under Minnesota Statutes, section 151.741, subdivision 5, paragraph (b), estimated to be $100,000 in fiscal year 2025, for reimbursement to manufacturers for insulin dispensed under the insulin safety net program in Minnesota Statutes, section 151.74. The base for this transfer is estimated to be $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 in fiscal year 2027. (c) Base Level Adjustment. The health care access fund base is increased by $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 and increased by $100,000 in fiscal year 2027. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end ARTICLE 2 STATE GOVERNMENT STATUTORY PROVISIONS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.099, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Leaders. The senate Committee on Rules and Administration for the senate and the house of representatives Committee on Rules and Legislative Administration for the house of representatives may each designate for their respective body up to deleted text begin fivedeleted text end new text begin sixnew text end leadership positions to receive up to 140 percent of the compensation of other members. At the commencement of each biennial legislative session, each house of the legislature shall adopt a resolution designating its majority and minority leader. The majority leader is the person elected by the caucus of members in each house which is its largest political affiliation. The minority leader is the person elected by the caucus which is its second largest political affiliation. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively from January 14, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.971, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Implementation of audit recommendations. new text end new text begin (a) By February 1 each year, as resources permit, the legislative auditor must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with fiscal jurisdiction over an entity subject to audit under this section. The report must detail whether the entity has implemented any recommendations identified by the legislative auditor during the prior five years in a financial audit, program evaluation, or special review. new text end new text begin (b) By July 1 each year, as resources permit, the legislative auditor must submit a report to designated legislators listing the standing committees in the senate and the house of representatives to which the legislative auditor did or did not present their reports under paragraph (a) in a public hearing. For purposes of this paragraph, "designated legislators" means the chairs and ranking minority members of the senate Committees on State Government Policy and Finance, Rules and Administration, and Finance, and the house of representatives Committees on State Government Finance and Policy, Rules and Legislative Administration, and Ways and Means. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.98, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Preparation; duties. (a) The head or chief administrative officer of each department or agency of the state government, including the supreme court, shall prepare a fiscal note consistent with the standards and procedures adopted under section 3.8853, at the request of the chairnew text begin or ranking minority membernew text end of the standing committee to which a bill has been referred, deleted text begin ordeleted text end the chair new text begin or ranking minority member new text end of the house of representatives Ways and Means Committee, or the chairnew text begin or ranking minority membernew text end of the senate Committee on Finance. (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "supreme court" includes all agencies, committees, and commissions supervised or appointed by the state supreme court or the state court administrator. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.98, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Distribution. A copy of the fiscal note shall be delivered to the chair new text begin or ranking minority member new text end of the Ways and Means Committee of the house of representatives, the chair new text begin or ranking minority member new text end of the Finance Committee of the senate, the chairnew text begin and ranking minority membernew text end of the standing committee to which the bill has been referred, deleted text begin todeleted text end the chief author of the billnew text begin ,new text end and deleted text begin todeleted text end the commissioner of management and budget. Sec. 5. new text begin [4.048] HEALTHY AGING SUBCABINET. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The Healthy Aging Subcabinet is established in Minnesota Management and Budget. The subcabinet is a distinct entity, separately identifiable from other state agencies and is dedicated to ensuring all people in Minnesota age with dignity and have equitable opportunities for the best possible health and well-being throughout the lifespan. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership; chair. new text end new text begin The subcabinet consists of the heads of the state agencies that administer policies that impact aging Minnesotans, as determined by the governor in consultation with the director appointed under subdivision 5. The director is the chair of the subcabinet. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Purpose. new text end new text begin The purpose of the subcabinet is to: new text end new text begin (1) assist in the design of a statewide planning process for a Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan under subdivision 10; new text end new text begin (2) engage public participation in creating policy solutions for identified challenges and opportunities related to aging in communities and living in one's own home; new text end new text begin (3) identify opportunities within state government to improve quality of life for older adults and promote healthy aging for all Minnesotans; and new text end new text begin (4) serve as a resource to the legislature on policies and practices that will enhance the aging experience for all Minnesotans. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin Led by the director, and in consultation with the Citizens' Engagement Council appointed under subdivision 6, the subcabinet must perform the following duties: new text end new text begin (1) integrate aging-related considerations into state agency planning, decision-making, and measurable outcomes for service delivery processes; new text end new text begin (2) promote the adoption of evidence-based approaches and policies that support healthy aging across the public and private sectors; new text end new text begin (3) ensure that member agencies conduct community engagement to inform strategic plans for each agency; new text end new text begin (4) identify federal and state funding for programs that address the negative impact of social determinants of health and well-being for Minnesotans and those that would significantly benefit from community strategies that prevent or delay disability and that enable quality-of-life outcomes throughout the lifespan; new text end new text begin (5) identify areas of potential savings through economic and community development and resource planning for an aging demographic; new text end new text begin (6) evaluate the impact on healthy aging of current aging-related initiatives in public and private sectors including housing, transit and workforce programs designed for older adults, and community health efforts in order to inform the Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan; new text end new text begin (7) coordinate with local and state agencies and Tribal Nations to analyze the health care delivery system for oral health, chronic and acute health conditions, and palliative and end-of-life care to identify and address access issues throughout Minnesota; new text end new text begin (8) in consultation with Tribal Nations, analyze the extent of family caregiving in private and public sectors to determine the need for greater support through aging policies initiated in the public and private sectors; new text end new text begin (9) in consultation with the ombudsman for long-term care, evaluate the oversight process of long-term care facilities, assisted living residences, and home-care agencies to ensure public safety and accountability; new text end new text begin (10) develop a transparency policy that tracks the use of government funding for long-term care to ensure state funding is used as intended; new text end new text begin (11) monitor and evaluate strategies and findings for progress reports during the planning process to be posted on the subcabinet's website; and new text end new text begin (12) in consultation with the ombudsman for long-term care, evaluate the need for additional long-term care services and training and recruitment of long-term care providers throughout the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Director; Office of Healthy Aging; staffing; duties. new text end new text begin (a) The governor must appoint a director to establish and lead an Office of Healthy Aging and serve as chair of the Healthy Aging Subcabinet. The director must possess a background in public health, public policy, and community engagement and possess demonstrated knowledge of older adult abilities and needed supports when living at home or in the person's community. The director may have experience working with an aging population. The director's responsibilities at a minimum are to: new text end new text begin (1) lead and coordinate the duties of the Healthy Aging Subcabinet; new text end new text begin (2) initiate and conduct a planning process to develop and adopt the Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan under subdivision 10; new text end new text begin (3) appoint members of, and provide support to, the Citizens' Engagement Council under subdivision 6; new text end new text begin (4) ensure community discussions across public and private sectors and with Tribal governments and the Indian Affairs Council to inform policy recommendations for the Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan under subdivision 10; new text end new text begin (5) ensure that the Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan under subdivision 10 reflects the perspectives of older adults, caregivers, health care and service providers, and advocacy organizations regarding the community development required to support older adults living at home and aging in the community; new text end new text begin (6) explore initiatives that enhance opportunities for an aging adult, regardless of age, income, or ability level, to live in the adult's own home and community if desired and safe; new text end new text begin (7) make efforts to break down silos and work across agencies to better target the state's role in addressing issues impacting aging in Minnesota communities; and new text end new text begin (8) establish and manage external partnerships and build relationships with communities, community leaders, and those who have direct experience with aging to ensure that all voices are represented in the work of the subcabinet, office, and Citizens' Engagement Council. new text end new text begin (b) The director may secure professional development and training opportunities to promote community development initiatives that address aging-related issues and support the Healthy Aging Subcabinet. new text end new text begin (c) The director may hire and compensate out of available funds additional staff as necessary to support the office and conduct the planning process. Staff members must possess relevant expertise and experience in areas such as aging services, policy analysis, community health, and community development and engagement. The director serves in the unclassified service. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Citizens' Engagement Council; public engagement. new text end new text begin (a) The director must appoint a Citizens' Engagement Council composed of 20 diverse members from different geographic regions and demographic groups, including older adults, caregivers, elder advocates, the Minnesota area agencies on aging, Tribal Nations, county agencies, nonprofit services, and business sectors. At least ten members of the council must be older adults, caregivers, or elder advocates, and these members may not otherwise represent a specific agency, service, or business sector. The purpose of the council is to: new text end new text begin (1) ensure the voices and perspectives of older adults are included in the recommended initiatives and policies for implementing the Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan under subdivision 10; new text end new text begin (2) provide feedback to the subcabinet on current aging-related programs and services, identifying areas for improvements and innovations; and new text end new text begin (3) provide ongoing input, advice, and strategies for the planning process to engage older Minnesotans and their families. new text end new text begin (b) Except where otherwise provided in this section, the terms, compensation, and removal of council members is governed by section 15.059. A member participating in council activities in the ordinary course of the member's employment is not entitled to compensation from the council. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Discretionary powers. new text end new text begin The office may apply for and receive grants from public sources and private foundations, award grants, and enter into contracts subject to applicable law. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Staff and administrative support. new text end new text begin The commissioner of management and budget, in coordination with other state agencies and boards as applicable, must provide staffing and administrative support to the Healthy Aging Subcabinet, the Office of Healthy Aging, and the Citizens' Engagement Council. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Public awareness. new text end new text begin In order to promote public engagement, the Office of Healthy Aging shall maintain a website and publish annual reports about the work of the office. The office shall also share on its website ideas for how Minnesotans can become involved with and informed on aging issues. By use of this medium, the office shall gather ideas from the public on needed programs for healthy aging in the community. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin The Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan. new text end new text begin The Office of Healthy Aging must adopt a plan entitled the Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan. A draft plan must be published no later than June 30, 2027, and a final plan must be adopted and published no later than January 15, 2028. The Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan shall include recommendations from the Citizens' Engagement Council and subcabinet members that support the health and well-being of older Minnesotans, their contributions, and their health care needs as follows: new text end new text begin (1) community-based initiatives that support living in one's own home and community if desired, regardless of age, income, or ability level, and as safely, independently, and comfortably as possible; new text end new text begin (2) community-based initiatives with public and private sector funding that provide older adults the choice to remain in and contribute to their communities with needed supports including access to health care and food, independent housing options, opportunities to socialize, innovative residential options for long-term care, and safe and affordable transportation; new text end new text begin (3) public policies that recommend systemwide improvements for safe and affordable housing options and transportation, innovative market-rate housing options, removal of employment barriers and increased opportunities for an aging workforce, outdoor recreational opportunities, broadband communications, and health care that includes mental health and oral health; new text end new text begin (4) public policies that address the current and future demand for home care, assisted living and skilled nursing facilities, and innovations for community-based long-term care services; workforce training, recruitment, and employment opportunities throughout Minnesota; and professional education opportunities for long-term care providers; new text end new text begin (5) public and private sector resource management policies that implement community health strategies to address social determinants of health and well-being; new text end new text begin (6) state agencies' strategic plans that drive innovations for healthy aging in communities across the lifespan; new text end new text begin (7) ongoing aging policy coordination and oversight within state and county agencies and in coordination with Tribal Nations, local communities, and the private sector; new text end new text begin (8) measures to ensure ongoing monitoring and evaluation of the impact of healthy aging policies and programs in order to make improvements and recommend further innovations; new text end new text begin (9) recommendations for full implementation of the Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan that includes administration, staffing, and appropriations; and new text end new text begin (10) measures to evaluate the success and impact of the Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Annual report. new text end new text begin By January 15 of each year, the office must submit a report to the governor and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over healthy aging policy and funding detailing the activities of the office for the preceding year with legislative recommendations for the coming year. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 8.16, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authority. new text begin (a) new text end The attorney general, or any deputy, assistant, or special assistant attorney general whom the attorney general authorizes in writing, has the authority in any county of the state to subpoena and require the production ofnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end any records ofnew text begin :new text end new text begin (i)new text end telephone companies, cellular phone companies,new text begin andnew text end paging companiesdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (ii)new text end subscribers of private computer networksnew text begin ,new text end including Internet service providers or computer bulletin board systemsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (iii)new text end electric companies, gas companies,new text begin andnew text end water utilitiesdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (iv)new text end chemical suppliersdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (v)new text end hotels and motelsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (vi)new text end pawn shopsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (vii)new text end airlines, buses, taxis, and other entities engaged in the business of transporting peopledeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end and new text begin (viii)new text end freight companies, self-service storage facilities, warehousing companies, package delivery companies, and other entities engaged in the businesses of transport, storage, or deliverydeleted text begin , anddeleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) wage and employment records; new text end new text begin (3)new text end records of the existence of safe deposit box account numbers and customer savings and checking account numbers maintained by financial institutions and safe deposit companiesnew text begin ;new text end new text begin (4) insurance records related to claim settlement; and new text end new text begin (5) banking, credit card, and financial records, including but not limited to a safe deposit, loan and account application and agreement, signature card, statement, check, transfer, account authorization, safe deposit access record, and documentation of fraud, that belong to the subject of an investigation conducted pursuant to the attorney general's authority under section 256B.12, whether the record is held in the investigation subject's name or in another person's namenew text end . new text begin (b)new text end Subpoenas may only be issued for records that are relevant to an ongoing legitimate law enforcement investigation. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 11A.07, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Duties and powers. The director, at the direction of the state board, shall: (1) plan, direct, coordinate, and execute administrative and investment functions in conformity with the policies and directives of the state board and the requirements of this chapter and of chapter 356A; (2) prepare and submit biennial and annual budgets to the board and with the approval of the board submit the budgets to the Department of Management and Budget; (3) employ professional and clerical staff as necessary; (4) report to the state board on all operations under the director's control and supervision; (5) maintain accurate and complete records of securities transactions and official activities; (6) establish a policy, which is subject to state board approval, relating to the purchase and sale of securities on the basis of competitive offerings or bids; (7) cause securities acquired to be kept in the custody of the commissioner of management and budget or other depositories consistent with chapter 356A, as the state board deems appropriate; (8) prepare and file with the director of the Legislative Reference Librarydeleted text begin , by December 31 of each year,deleted text end a report summarizing the activities of the state board, the council, and the director during the preceding fiscal year; (9) include on the state board's website its annual report and an executive summary of its quarterly reports; (10) require state officials from any department or agency to produce and provide access to any financial documents the state board deems necessary in the conduct of its investment activities; (11) receive and expend legislative appropriations; and (12) undertake any other activities necessary to implement the duties and powers set forth in this subdivision consistent with chapter 356A. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 11A.07, subdivision 4b, is amended to read: Subd. 4b. Annual report. The report required under subdivision 4, clause (8), must include an executive summarynew text begin , must be prepared and filed after the completion of the applicable fiscal year audit but no later than March 31 of each year,new text end and must be prepared so as to provide the legislature and the people of the state with: (1) a clear, comprehensive summary of the portfolio composition, the transactions, the total annual rate of return, and the yield to the state treasury and to each of the funds with assets invested by the state board; and (2) the recipients of business placed or commissions allocated among the various commercial banks, investment bankers, money managers, and brokerage organizations and the amount of these commissions or other fees. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16A.057, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Monitoring Office of the Legislative Auditor audits. new text begin (a) new text end The commissioner must review audit reports from the Office of the Legislative Auditor and take appropriate steps to address internal control problems found in executive agencies. new text begin (b) The commissioner must submit a report to the legislative auditor no later than September 1 of each year detailing the implementation status of all recommendations identified in an auditor's financial audit, program evaluation, or special review during the prior five years. The report must include a specific itemization of recommendations that have not been implemented during that period, along with the basis for that decision. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 240.131, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Payments to state. (a) A regulatory fee is imposed at the rate of deleted text begin onedeleted text end new text begin twonew text end percent of all amounts wagered by Minnesota residents with an authorized advance deposit wagering provider. The fee shall be declared on a form prescribed by the commission. The ADW provider must pay the fee to the commission no more than 15 days after the end of the month in which the wager was made. Fees collected under this paragraph must be deposited in the state treasury and credited to a racing and card-playing regulation account in the special revenue fund and are appropriated to the commission to offset the costs incurred by the commission as described in section 240.30, subdivision 9, or the costs associated with regulating horse racing and pari-mutuel wagering in Minnesota. (b) A breeders fund fee is imposed in the amount of one-quarter of one percent of all amounts wagered by Minnesota residents with an authorized advance deposit wagering provider. The fee shall be declared on a form prescribed by the commission. The ADW provider must pay the fee to the commission no more than 15 days after the end of the month in which the wager was made. Fees collected under this paragraph must be deposited in the state treasury and credited to a racing and card-playing regulation account in the special revenue fund and are appropriated to the commission to offset the cost of administering the breeders fund, to support racehorse adoption, retirement, and repurposing, and promote horse breeding in Minnesota. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.12, is amended to read: 256B.12 LEGAL REPRESENTATION. The attorney general or the appropriate county attorney appearing at the direction of the attorney general shall be the attorney for the state agency, and the county attorney of the appropriate county shall be the attorney for the local agency in all matters pertaining hereto. To prosecute under this chapter or sections deleted text begin 609.466 anddeleted text end new text begin 609.467 andnew text end 609.52, subdivision 2, or to recover payments wrongfully made under this chapter, the attorney general or the appropriate county attorney, acting independently or at the direction of the attorney general may institute a criminal or civil action. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326A.03, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Certificate; required education and experiencenew text begin until July 1, 2030new text end . (a) On or after July 1, 2006new text begin , and before July 1, 2030new text end , a person who has passed the examination required in this section must be granted a certificate as a certified public accountant provided: (1) the person certifies to the board that the person has completed at least 150 semester or 225 quarter hours at a college or university that is fully accredited by a recognized accrediting agency listed with the United States Department of Education, or an equivalent accrediting association, and has completed at least one year of experience of the type specified in paragraph (b); (2) the board verifies the certifications; and (3) the person complies with requirements for initial issuance of the certificate as a certified public accountant as prescribed by the board by rule. (b) An applicant for initial issuance of a certificate under this subdivision shall show that the applicant has had one year of experience. Acceptable experience includes providing any type of service or advice involving the use of accounting, attest, compilation, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, or consulting skills, as verified by a licensee and meeting requirements prescribed by the board by rule. Acceptable experience may be gained through employment in government, industry, academia, or public practice. Experience as an auditor in the Office of the Legislative Auditor or State Auditor, as verified by a licensee, shall be acceptable experience. new text begin (c) This subdivision expires July 1, 2030. new text end Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326A.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6a. new text end new text begin Certificate; required education and experience after June 30, 2030. new text end new text begin (a) On and after July 1, 2030, or during the transitional period as provided in subdivision 6b, the board must grant a certificate as a certified public accountant to a person who has not previously been certified and who has passed the examination required in this section if: new text end new text begin (1) the person certifies to the board that the person has: new text end new text begin (i) completed a master's degree at a college or university that is fully accredited by a recognized accrediting agency listed with the United States Department of Education and has completed at least one year of acceptable experience as described in paragraph (b); or new text end new text begin (ii) earned a bachelor's or graduate degree from a college or university that is fully accredited by a recognized accrediting agency listed with the United States Department of Education and has completed at least two years of acceptable experience as described in paragraph (b); new text end new text begin (2) the board verifies the certification under clause (1); and new text end new text begin (3) the person complies with requirements as prescribed by the board for an initial certificate. new text end new text begin (b) Acceptable experience includes providing any type of service or advice that involves accounting, attestation, compilation, management advisement, financial advisement, tax, or consulting, as verified by a licensee and meeting requirements prescribed by the board by rule. Acceptable experience may be gained through employment in government, industry, academia, or public practice. Experience as an auditor in the Office of the Legislative Auditor or the Office of the State Auditor, as verified by a licensee, is acceptable experience. new text end Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326A.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6b. new text end new text begin Transitional period. new text end new text begin (a) Until July 1, 2030, a person must be granted an initial certificate as a certified public accountant if the person meets either: new text end new text begin (1) all requirements under subdivision 6; or new text end new text begin (2) all requirements under subdivision 6a. new text end new text begin (b) This subdivision expires July 1, 2030. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326A.14, is amended to read: 326A.14 deleted text begin SUBSTANTIAL EQUIVALENCYdeleted text end new text begin MOBILITYnew text end . Subdivision 1. Requirements. (a) An individual whose principal place of business is not in this state deleted text begin and who holds a valid license in good standing as a certified public accountant from any state which, upon verification, is in substantial equivalence with the certified public accountant licensure requirements of section 326A.03, subdivisions 3, 4, and 6,deleted text end shall be presumed to have qualifications substantially equivalent to this state's requirements and shall have all the privileges of licensees of this state without the need to obtain a licensedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin , if the person:new text end new text begin (1) holds a valid certificate, license, or permit to practice as a certified public accountant that was issued in another state and is in good standing to practice as a certified public accountant in that state; new text end new text begin (2) has a bachelor's degree or higher from an accredited postsecondary school with an accounting concentration or equivalent as determined by the board by rule; and new text end new text begin (3) has passed the Uniform CPA Examination. new text end new text begin (b)new text end Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this chapter, an individual who offers or renders professional services, whether in person, by mail, telephone, or electronic means, under deleted text begin thisdeleted text end paragraphnew text begin (a)new text end : (1) shall be granted practice privileges in this state; (2) is subject to the requirements in paragraph (c); and (3) is not required to provide any notice or other submission. deleted text begin (b) An individual whose principal place of business is not in this state and who holds a valid license in good standing as a certified public accountant from any state whose certified public accountant licensure qualifications, upon verification, are not substantially equivalent with the licensure requirements of section 326A.03, subdivisions 3, 4, and 6, shall be presumed to have qualifications substantially equivalent to this state's requirements and shall have all the privileges of licensees of this state without the need to obtain a license if the individual obtains verification, as specified in board rule, that the individual's qualifications are substantially equivalent to the licensure requirements of section 326A.03, subdivisions 3, 4, and 6. For purposes of this paragraph, any individual who passed the Uniform CPA Examination and holds a valid license issued by any other state prior to January 1, 2009, is exempt from the education requirement in section 326A.03, subdivision 6, paragraph (a), provided the individual meets the education requirement in section 326A.03, subdivision 3. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this chapter, an individual who offers or renders professional services, whether in person, by mail, telephone, or electronic means, under this paragraph: (1) shall, after the verification specified by adopted rules, be granted practice privileges in this state; (2) is subject to the requirements in paragraph (c); and (3) is not required to provide any notice or other submission. deleted text end (c) An individual licensee of another state exercising the privilege afforded under this section and the firm which employs that licensee are deemed to have consented, as a condition of the grant of this privilege: (1) to the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and disciplinary authority of the board; (2) to comply with this chapter and the board's rules; (3) to the appointment of the state board that issued the license as the licensee's agent upon whom process may be served in any action or proceeding by this board against the licensee; and (4) to cease offering or rendering professional services in this state individually and on behalf of a firm in the event the license issued by the state of the individual's principal place of business is no longer valid or in good standing. (d) An individual who has been granted practice privileges under this section who performs attest services as defined in section 326A.01, subdivision 2, clause (1), (4), or (5), for any entity with its headquarters in this state, may only do so through a firm which has obtained a permit under section 326A.05. Subd. 2. Use of title in another state. A licensee of this state offering or rendering services or using the CPA title in another state is subject to the same disciplinary action in this state for which the licensee would be subject to discipline for an act committed in the other state. The board shall investigate any complaint made by the board of accountancy of another state. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 349A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 13a. new text end new text begin Responsible lottery official. new text end new text begin "Responsible lottery official" means the officers, directors, or owners of an organization, firm, partnership, or corporation that have oversight of lottery ticket sales. new text end Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 349A.06, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Qualifications. (a) The director may not contract with a retailernew text begin who is a sole proprietornew text end who: (1) is under the age of 18; (2) is in business solely as a seller of lottery tickets; (3) owes $500 or more in delinquent taxes as defined in section 270C.72; (4) has been convicted within the previous five years of a felony or gross misdemeanor, any crime involving fraud or misrepresentation, or a gambling-related offensenew text begin in any jurisdiction in the United Statesnew text end ; (5) is a member of the immediate family, residing in the same household, as the director or any employee of the lottery; (6) in the director's judgment does not have the financial stability or responsibility to act as a lottery retailer, or whose contracting as a lottery retailer would adversely affect the public health, welfare, and safety, or endanger the security and integrity of the lottery; or (7) is a currency exchange, as defined in section 53A.01. deleted text begin A contract entered into before August 1, 1990, which violates clause (7) may continue in effect until its expiration but may not be renewed. deleted text end (b) new text begin The director may not contract with a retailer that is an organization, firm, partnership, or corporation that:new text end new text begin (1) has a responsible lottery official who: new text end new text begin (i) is under the age of 18; new text end new text begin (ii) owes $500 or more in delinquent taxes as defined in section 270C.72; or new text end new text begin (iii) has been convicted within the previous five years of a felony or gross misdemeanor, any crime involving fraud or misrepresentation, or a gambling-related offense in any jurisdiction in the United States; new text end deleted text begin An organization, firm, partnership, or corporation thatdeleted text end new text begin (2)new text end has a stockholder who owns more than five percent of the business or the stock of the corporation,new text begin a responsible lottery official,new text end an officer, ornew text begin anew text end director, that deleted text begin does not meet the requirements of paragraph (a), clause (4), is not eligible to be a lottery retailer under this sectiondeleted text end new text begin is a member of the immediate family, residing in the same household, as the director or any employee of the lottery; ornew text end new text begin (3)(i) is in business solely as a seller of lottery tickets; new text end new text begin (ii) in the director's judgment does not have the financial stability or responsibility to act as a lottery retailer, or whose contracting as a lottery retailer would adversely affect the public health, welfare, and safety, or endanger the security and integrity of the lottery; or new text end new text begin (iii) is a currency exchange, as defined in section 53A.01new text end . deleted text begin (c) The restrictions under paragraph (a), clause (4), do not apply to an organization, partnership, or corporation if the director determines that the organization, partnership, or firm has terminated its relationship with the individual whose actions directly contributed to the disqualification under this subdivision. deleted text end Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 349A.06, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Criminal history. deleted text begin The director may request the director of alcohol and gambling enforcement to investigate all applicants for lottery retailer contracts to determine their compliance with the requirements of subdivision 2. deleted text end new text begin (a) Upon the director's request, an applicant for a lottery retailer contract must submit a completed criminal history records check consent form, a full set of classifiable fingerprints, and required fees to the director or the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension. Upon receipt of the information, the director must submit the completed criminal history records check consent form, full set of classifiable fingerprints, and required fees to the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension. new text end new text begin (b) After receiving the information, the bureau must conduct a Minnesota criminal history records check of the individual. The bureau is authorized to exchange the fingerprints with the Federal Bureau of Investigation to obtain the applicant's national criminal history record information. The bureau must return the results of the Minnesota and national criminal history records checks to the director to determine the individual's compliance with the requirements of subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (c) The director must request a Minnesota and national criminal history records check for any sole proprietor or responsible lottery official that applies to be a lottery retailer and (1) has not undergone a check under this section within the past seven years, or (2) has had any lapse in a contract to sell lottery tickets. new text end new text begin (d) new text end The director may issue a temporary contract, valid for not more than 90 days, to an applicant pending the completion of the investigation or a final determination of qualifications under this section. The director has access to all criminal history data compiled by the deleted text begin director of alcohol and gambling enforcementdeleted text end new text begin Bureau of Criminal Apprehensionnew text end on (1) any person holding or applying for a retailer contract, (2) any person holding a lottery vendor contract or who has submitted a bid on such a contract, and (3) any person applying for employment with the lottery. Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 349A.06, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Cancellation, suspension, and refusal to renew contracts or locations. (a) The director shall cancel the contract of any lottery retailer or prohibit a lottery retailer from selling lottery tickets at a business location who: (1) hasnew text begin a sole proprietor or responsible lottery official that hasnew text end been convicted of a felony or gross misdemeanornew text begin in any jurisdiction in the United Statesnew text end ; (2) hasnew text begin a sole proprietor or responsible lottery official that hasnew text end committednew text begin any crime involvingnew text end frauddeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ornew text end misrepresentation, or deleted text begin deceitdeleted text end new text begin a gambling-related offense in any jurisdiction in the United Statesnew text end ; (3) has provided false or misleading information to the lottery; or (4) has acted in a manner prejudicial to public confidence in the integrity of the lottery. (b) The director may cancel, suspend, or refuse to renew the contract of any lottery retailer or prohibit a lottery retailer from selling lottery tickets at a business location who: (1) changes business location; (2) fails to account for lottery tickets received or the proceeds from tickets sold; (3) fails to remit funds to the director in accordance with the director's rules; (4) violates a law or a rule or order of the director; (5) fails to comply with any of the terms in the lottery retailer's contract; (6) fails to file a bond, securities, or a letter of credit as required under subdivision 3; (7) in the opinion of the director fails to maintain a sufficient sales volume to justify continuation as a lottery retailer; or (8) has violated section 340A.503, subdivision 2, clause (1), two or more times within a two-year period. (c) The director may also cancel, suspend, or refuse to renew a lottery retailer's contract or prohibit a lottery retailer from selling lottery tickets at a business location if there is a material change in any of the factors considered by the director under subdivision 2. (d) A contract cancellation, suspension, refusal to renew, or prohibiting a lottery retailer from selling lottery tickets at a business location under this subdivision is a contested case under sections 14.57 to 14.69 and is in addition to any criminal penalties provided for a violation of law or rule. (e) The director may temporarily suspend a contract or temporarily prohibit a lottery retailer from selling lottery tickets at a business location without notice for any of the reasons specified in this subdivision provided that a hearing is conducted within seven days after a request for a hearing is made by a lottery retailer. Within 20 days after receiving the administrative law judge's report, the director shall issue an order vacating the temporary suspension or prohibition or making any other appropriate order. If no hearing is requested within 30 days of the temporary suspension or prohibition taking effect, the suspension or prohibition becomes permanent unless the director vacates or modifies the order. Sec. 20. new text begin [609.467] MEDICAL ASSISTANCE FRAUD. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Medical assistance fraud prohibited. new text end new text begin A person who intentionally presents, submits, tenders, offers, or participates in the preparation of a claim for payment, claim for reimbursement, cost report, or rate application relating to the payment of medical assistance funds under chapter 256B knowing or having reason to know that any part of the claim, report, or application is false is guilty of medical assistance fraud and may be sentenced as provided in subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin Whoever violates subdivision 1 may be sentenced as follows: new text end new text begin (1) to imprisonment of not more than 20 years, payment of a fine of not more than $100,000, or both if the part of any claim for payment, claim for reimbursement, cost report, or rate application submitted, tendered, or offered that is false is more than $35,000; new text end new text begin (2) to imprisonment of not more than ten years, payment of a fine of not more than $20,000, or both if: new text end new text begin (i) the part of any claim for payment, claim for reimbursement, cost report, or rate application submitted, tendered, or offered that is false is more than $5,000 but not more than $35,000; or new text end new text begin (ii) the part of any claim for payment, claim for reimbursement, cost report, or rate application submitted, tendered, or offered that is false is not more than $5,000 and the person has been convicted within the preceding five years for an offense under this section, section 256.98; 268.182; 609.24; 609.245; 609.247; 609.52; 609.522; 609.53; 609.582, subdivision 1, 2, or 3; 609.625; 609.63; 609.631; or 609.821, or a statute from another state, the United States, or a foreign jurisdiction, in conformity with any of those sections, and the person received a felony or gross misdemeanor sentence for the offense, or a sentence that was stayed under section 609.135 if the offense to which a plea was entered would allow imposition of a felony or gross misdemeanor sentence; or new text end new text begin (3) to imprisonment of not more than five years, payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both if the part of any claim for payment, claim for reimbursement, cost report, or rate application submitted, tendered, or offered that is false is not more than $5,000. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Aggregation. new text end new text begin The total of all claims for payment, claims for reimbursement, cost reports, and rate applications submitted, tendered, or offered in violation of subdivision 1 within any six-month period may be aggregated and the defendant charged accordingly in applying the provisions of subdivision 2. When the same person commits two or more offenses in two or more counties, the accused may be prosecuted for all of the offenses aggregated under this subdivision in any county in which one of the offenses was committed. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Venue. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in section 627.01, a violation of this section may be prosecuted in: new text end new text begin (1) the county where any part of the offense occurred; or new text end new text begin (2) the county where the entity who received a claim for payment, claim for reimbursement, cost report, or rate application is located. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.52, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Acts constituting theft. (a) Whoever does any of the following commits theft and may be sentenced as provided in subdivision 3: (1) intentionally and without claim of right takes, uses, transfers, conceals or retains possession of movable property of another without the other's consent and with intent to deprive the owner permanently of possession of the property; or (2) with or without having a legal interest in movable property, intentionally and without consent, takes the property out of the possession of a pledgee or other person having a superior right of possession, with intent thereby to deprive the pledgee or other person permanently of the possession of the property; or (3) obtains for the actor or another the possession, custody, or title to property of or performance of services by a third person by intentionally deceiving the third person with a false representation which is known to be false, made with intent to defraud, and which does defraud the person to whom it is made. "False representation" includes without limitation: (i) the issuance of a check, draft, or order for the payment of money, except a forged check as defined in section 609.631, or the delivery of property knowing that the actor is not entitled to draw upon the drawee therefor or to order the payment or delivery thereof; or (ii) a promise made with intent not to perform. Failure to perform is not evidence of intent not to perform unless corroborated by other substantial evidence; or deleted text begin (iii) the preparation or filing of a claim for reimbursement, a rate application, or a cost report used to establish a rate or claim for payment for medical care provided to a recipient of medical assistance under chapter deleted text end deleted text begin 256B deleted text end deleted text begin , which intentionally and falsely states the costs of or actual services provided by a vendor of medical care; or deleted text end deleted text begin (iv)deleted text end new text begin (iii)new text end the preparation or filing of a claim for reimbursement for providing treatment or supplies required to be furnished to an employee under section 176.135 which intentionally and falsely states the costs of or actual treatment or supplies provided; or deleted text begin (v)deleted text end new text begin (iv)new text end the preparation or filing of a claim for reimbursement for providing treatment or supplies required to be furnished to an employee under section 176.135 for treatment or supplies that the provider knew were medically unnecessary, inappropriate, or excessive; or (4) by swindling, whether by artifice, trick, device, or any other means, obtains property or services from another person; or (5) intentionally commits any of the acts listed in this subdivision but with intent to exercise temporary control only and: (i) the control exercised manifests an indifference to the rights of the owner or the restoration of the property to the owner; or (ii) the actor pledges or otherwise attempts to subject the property to an adverse claim; or (iii) the actor intends to restore the property only on condition that the owner pay a reward or buy back or make other compensation; or (6) finds lost property and, knowing or having reasonable means of ascertaining the true owner, appropriates it to the finder's own use or to that of another not entitled thereto without first having made reasonable effort to find the owner and offer and surrender the property to the owner; or (7) intentionally obtains property or services, offered upon the deposit of a sum of money or tokens in a coin or token operated machine or other receptacle, without making the required deposit or otherwise obtaining the consent of the owner; or (8) intentionally and without claim of right converts any article representing a trade secret, knowing it to be such, to the actor's own use or that of another person or makes a copy of an article representing a trade secret, knowing it to be such, and intentionally and without claim of right converts the same to the actor's own use or that of another person. It shall be a complete defense to any prosecution under this clause for the defendant to show that information comprising the trade secret was rightfully known or available to the defendant from a source other than the owner of the trade secret; or (9) leases or rents personal property under a written instrument and who: (i) with intent to place the property beyond the control of the lessor conceals or aids or abets the concealment of the property or any part thereof; or (ii) sells, conveys, or encumbers the property or any part thereof without the written consent of the lessor, without informing the person to whom the lessee sells, conveys, or encumbers that the same is subject to such lease or rental contract with intent to deprive the lessor of possession thereof; or (iii) does not return the property to the lessor at the end of the lease or rental term, plus agreed-upon extensions, with intent to wrongfully deprive the lessor of possession of the property; or (iv) returns the property to the lessor at the end of the lease or rental term, plus agreed-upon extensions, but does not pay the lease or rental charges agreed upon in the written instrument, with intent to wrongfully deprive the lessor of the agreed-upon charges. For the purposes of items (iii) and (iv), the value of the property must be at least $100. Evidence that a lessee used a false, fictitious, or not current name, address, or place of employment in obtaining the property or fails or refuses to return the property or pay the rental contract charges to lessor within five days after written demand for the return has been served personally in the manner provided for service of process of a civil action or sent by certified mail to the last known address of the lessee, whichever shall occur later, shall be evidence of intent to violate this clause. Service by certified mail shall be deemed to be complete upon deposit in the United States mail of such demand, postpaid and addressed to the person at the address for the person set forth in the lease or rental agreement, or, in the absence of the address, to the person's last known place of residence; or (10) alters, removes, or obliterates numbers or symbols placed on movable property for purpose of identification by the owner or person who has legal custody or right to possession thereof with the intent to prevent identification, if the person who alters, removes, or obliterates the numbers or symbols is not the owner and does not have the permission of the owner to make the alteration, removal, or obliteration; or (11) with the intent to prevent the identification of property involved, so as to deprive the rightful owner of possession thereof, alters or removes any permanent serial number, permanent distinguishing number or manufacturer's identification number on personal property or possesses, sells or buys any personal property knowing or having reason to know that the permanent serial number, permanent distinguishing number or manufacturer's identification number has been removed or altered; or (12) intentionally deprives another of a lawful charge for cable television service by: (i) making or using or attempting to make or use an unauthorized external connection outside the individual dwelling unit whether physical, electrical, acoustical, inductive, or other connection; or by (ii) attaching any unauthorized device to any cable, wire, microwave, or other component of a licensed cable communications system as defined in chapter 238. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the electronic video rerecording of program material transmitted on the cable communications system by a subscriber for fair use as defined by Public Law 94-553, section 107; or (13) except as provided in clauses (12) and (14), obtains the services of another with the intention of receiving those services without making the agreed or reasonably expected payment of money or other consideration; or (14) intentionally deprives another of a lawful charge for telecommunications service by: (i) making, using, or attempting to make or use an unauthorized connection whether physical, electrical, by wire, microwave, radio, or other means to a component of a local telecommunication system as provided in chapter 237; or (ii) attaching an unauthorized device to a cable, wire, microwave, radio, or other component of a local telecommunication system as provided in chapter 237. The existence of an unauthorized connection is prima facie evidence that the occupier of the premises: (A) made or was aware of the connection; and (B) was aware that the connection was unauthorized; (15) with intent to defraud, diverts corporate property other than in accordance with general business purposes or for purposes other than those specified in the corporation's articles of incorporation; or (16) with intent to defraud, authorizes or causes a corporation to make a distribution in violation of section 302A.551, or any other state law in conformity with it; or (17) takes or drives a motor vehicle without the consent of the owner or an authorized agent of the owner, knowing or having reason to know that the owner or an authorized agent of the owner did not give consent; or (18) intentionally, and without claim of right, takes motor fuel from a retailer without the retailer's consent and with intent to deprive the retailer permanently of possession of the fuel by driving a motor vehicle from the premises of the retailer without having paid for the fuel dispensed into the vehicle; or (19) commits wage theft under subdivision 1, clause (13). (b) Proof that the driver of a motor vehicle into which motor fuel was dispensed drove the vehicle from the premises of the retailer without having paid for the fuel permits the factfinder to infer that the driver acted intentionally and without claim of right, and that the driver intended to deprive the retailer permanently of possession of the fuel. This paragraph does not apply if: (1) payment has been made to the retailer within 30 days of the receipt of notice of nonpayment under section 604.15; or (2) a written notice as described in section 604.15, subdivision 4, disputing the retailer's claim, has been sent. This paragraph does not apply to the owner of a motor vehicle if the vehicle or the vehicle's license plate has been reported stolen before the theft of the fuel. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 628.26, is amended to read: 628.26 LIMITATIONS. (a) Indictments or complaints for any crime resulting in the death of the victim may be found or made at any time after the death of the person killed. (b) Indictments or complaints for a violation of section 609.25 may be found or made at any time after the commission of the offense. (c) Indictments or complaints for violation of section 609.282 may be found or made at any time after the commission of the offense if the victim was under the age of 18 at the time of the offense. (d) Indictments or complaints for violation of section 609.282 where the victim was 18 years of age or older at the time of the offense, or 609.42, subdivision 1, clause (1) or (2), shall be found or made and filed in the proper court within six years after the commission of the offense. (e) Indictments or complaints for violation of sections 609.322, 609.342 to 609.345, and 609.3458 may be found or made at any time after the commission of the offense. (f) Indictments or complaints for violation of sections deleted text begin 609.466deleted text end new text begin 609.467new text end and 609.52, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (3), item (iii), shall be found or made and filed in the proper court within six years after the commission of the offense. (g) Indictments or complaints for violation of section 609.2335, 609.52, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (3), items (i) and (ii), (4), (15), or (16), 609.631, or 609.821, where the value of the property or services stolen is more than $35,000, or for violation of section 609.527 where the offense involves eight or more direct victims or the total combined loss to the direct and indirect victims is more than $35,000, shall be found or made and filed in the proper court within five years after the commission of the offense. (h) Except for violations relating to false material statements, representations or omissions, indictments or complaints for violations of section 609.671 shall be found or made and filed in the proper court within five years after the commission of the offense. (i) Indictments or complaints for violation of sections 609.561 to 609.563, shall be found or made and filed in the proper court within five years after the commission of the offense. (j) Indictments or complaints for violation of section 609.746 shall be found or made and filed in the proper court within the later of three years after the commission of the offense or three years after the offense was reported to law enforcement authorities. (k) In all other cases, indictments or complaints shall be found or made and filed in the proper court within three years after the commission of the offense. (l) The limitations periods contained in this section shall exclude any period of time during which the defendant was not an inhabitant of or usually resident within this state. (m) The limitations periods contained in this section for an offense shall not include any period during which the alleged offender participated under a written agreement in a pretrial diversion program relating to that offense. (n) The limitations periods contained in this section shall not include any period of time during which physical evidence relating to the offense was undergoing DNA analysis, as defined in section 299C.155, unless the defendant demonstrates that the prosecuting or law enforcement agency purposefully delayed the DNA analysis process in order to gain an unfair advantage. Sec. 23. new text begin OPEN POSITIONS REPORT.new text end new text begin The commissioner of management and budget must report the number of posted executive branch job openings that have gone unfilled for at least six months. The commissioner's report must identify such openings by agency and job title, and identify which specific job titles or classes take longest to fill on average and those that experience the most turnover. No later than February 1, 2026, August 1, 2026, and February 1, 2027, the commissioner must submit this report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over state government finance and policy. new text end Sec. 24. new text begin INTEGRATING APPLICATION INFORMATION AND A REFERRAL PROCESS FOR THE TRANSIT ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ON THE MNBENEFITS WEB PORTAL.new text end new text begin No later than June 30, 2026, the commissioner of children, youth, and families, in consultation with Metro Transit and the commissioners of transportation, human services, and Minnesota IT Services, must integrate application information and a referral process for the transit assistance program administered by Metro Transit into the MNbenefits web portal. Metro Transit and the Metropolitan Council must continue to process applications for the transit assistance program after application information and a referral process are integrated into the MNbenefits web portal. new text end Sec. 25. new text begin STATUE REPLACEMENT.new text end new text begin The commissioner of administration may accept private funds, submit a request to the Joint Committee on the Library of Congress, and erect a new statue in Statuary Hall in the United States Capitol, including removing an existing statue from Statuary Hall and transporting it to Minnesota, recasting an existing statue in Minnesota, and transporting and installing the new statue in Statuary Hall. All money accepted by the commissioner under this section must be deposited in a dedicated account in the special revenue fund and is appropriated to the commissioner for purposes of this section. The account expires on January 1, 2028, with any money remaining in the account at that time appropriated to the State Arts Board for purposes of the programs and activities authorized under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 129D. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate jointly notify the revisor of statutes and the commissioner of administration that the state has satisfied the requirements for a statue replacement request under United States Code, title 2, chapter 30, section 2132. new text end Sec. 26. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Employee gainsharing. new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16A.90, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Advisory Council on Infrastructure. new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 16B.356; 16B.357; 16B.358; and 16B.359, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin CPA substantial equivalence. new text end new text begin Minnesota Rules, part 1105.7900, item D, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Medical assistance fraud. new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.466, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 3 is effective the day following final enactment. new text end ARTICLE 3 BUSINESS FILING FRAUD AND DECEPTIVE MAILINGS Section 1. new text begin [5.60] LATE RENEWAL PENALTY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Late penalty. new text end new text begin The secretary of state may require a person to pay a late penalty of up to $25 when filing for renewal or reinstatement of a business entity that the secretary of state has dissolved, terminated, or revoked due to failure to file an annual renewal, or a business entity for which the secretary of state has canceled a certificate of authority. The secretary of state must deposit all late penalty revenue in the account created under subdivision 2. The late penalty is in addition to any other fee or assessment provided by law. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Account; appropriation. new text end new text begin The secretary of state fraud prevention and data security account is created in the special revenue fund. Money in the account is appropriated to the secretary of state to: new text end new text begin (1) fulfill statutory and constitutional duties regarding fraud prevention and data privacy and security, including but not limited to cyber security and the Minnesota Business Filing Fraud Prevention Act under sections 300.70 to 300.78; new text end new text begin (2) ensure the accuracy and completeness of documents that are permitted or required under law to be filed with the secretary of state; and new text end new text begin (3) enhance the secretary of state's information and telecommunications technology systems and services. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Annual report. new text end new text begin By February 15 each year, the secretary of state must submit a report identifying the amount of revenue collected and outcomes achieved under this section to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over state government finance and policy. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025, and applies to renewal or reinstatement applications submitted on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.485, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Scope. The sections referred to in subdivisions 3 to deleted text begin 6deleted text end new text begin 7new text end are codified outside this chapter. Those sections classify corporation data as other than public, place restrictions on access to government data, or involve data sharing. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.485, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Business fraud investigations. new text end new text begin Government data related to investigations under sections 300.70 to 300.78 are governed by section 300.78. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [300.70] CITATION AND DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Citation. new text end new text begin Sections 300.70 to 300.78 may be cited as the "Minnesota Business Filing Fraud Prevention Act." new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of sections 300.70 to 300.78, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Complainant" means a person who (1) delivers a declaration of wrongful filing, and (2) has a connection to the allegedly wrongful filing or the related business. new text end new text begin (c) "Filer" means the person who has allegedly made a wrongful filing. new text end new text begin (d) "Office" means the Office of the Secretary of State. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [300.71] DECLARATION OF WRONGFUL FILING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Form and contents of declaration. new text end new text begin (a) A complainant may deliver a declaration of wrongful filing to the office if the complainant believes that a document filed under chapters 301 to 323A: new text end new text begin (1) was not authorized to be filed; and new text end new text begin (2) was filed with the intent to: (i) modify the ownership, registered agent, business address, contact information, governance, or other information of a business on record; or (ii) register a business using another person's name, address, or identity. new text end new text begin (b) A declaration of wrongful filing must include: new text end new text begin (1) the file number of the allegedly wrongful filing; new text end new text begin (2) the complainant's name, mailing address, and email address; new text end new text begin (3) whether the complainant is employed by or has an ownership interest in the business that is the subject of the filing; new text end new text begin (4) any information or evidence supporting the complainant's allegations under this section; new text end new text begin (5) a statement verifying the complainant believes in good faith that the facts stated in the declaration are true; and new text end new text begin (6) any other information the office deems necessary. new text end new text begin (c) The office must provide a form for declarations filed under this section. A complainant must use the provided form when submitting a declaration of wrongful filing. new text end new text begin (d) A false material statement of fact in a declaration of wrongful filing or any other document submitted under sections 300.70 to 300.78 is a violation of section 609.48. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Review of declaration. new text end new text begin (a) The office must promptly accept or reject a declaration of wrongful filing. new text end new text begin (b) The office may reject a declaration of wrongful filing that is incomplete or does not use the provided form or if the office reasonably believes it was delivered with the intent to harass or defraud the filer. The office may reject a declaration of wrongful filing if the office has already issued a final order on the filing identified in the declaration. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Nonexclusive remedy. new text end new text begin The remedy in sections 300.70 to 300.78 is not exclusive. An aggrieved party may seek district court action regardless of whether the individual has initiated or completed the procedure described in these sections. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [300.72] NOTICE. new text end new text begin (a) When the office accepts a declaration of wrongful filing, the office must provide notice of the declaration to the complainant and the filer. The notice must describe the allegations made in the declaration and the process used to resolve the allegations. The notice must prominently state the response timeline in section 300.73 and the consequences if the filer does not respond. The notice must prominently state that a false statement of material fact in any documents submitted under sections 300.70 to 300.78 is a violation of section 609.48. new text end new text begin (b) The office must send the notice by first class mail, postage prepaid, to: new text end new text begin (1) the complainant at the mailing address provided in the declaration; and new text end new text begin (2) the filer at: new text end new text begin (i) the most recent registered business address associated with the filing named in the declaration; or new text end new text begin (ii) if a mailing address for the filer cannot be identified, the notice may be served on the filer as provided under section 5.25, subdivision 6. new text end new text begin (c) Notice is deemed received by the complainant and the filer upon mailing. new text end new text begin (d) If the notice to the filer is returned as undeliverable, the office may deem the filing fraudulent and immediately issue a final order as provided under section 300.76, notwithstanding the time period under section 300.73. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [300.73] RESPONSE. new text end new text begin (a) After notice is received, the filer must respond in writing to the allegations in the declaration. The response must be received by the office within 21 calendar days of receipt of the notice. new text end new text begin (b) The filer's response under this section must include any information refuting the allegations contained in the complainant's declaration. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [300.74] PROCEDURE WHEN NO RESPONSE RECEIVED. new text end new text begin If the filer does not respond within the time period under section 300.73, the office must deem the filing fraudulent and issue a final order as provided under section 300.76. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [300.75] PROCEDURE WHEN RESPONSE RECEIVED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Preliminary determination. new text end new text begin (a) If the filer responds within the period under section 300.73, the office must further investigate the allegations in the declaration and information in the response and make a preliminary determination regarding whether the filing named in the declaration is fraudulent. new text end new text begin (b) The office may request additional information from the complainant and the filer if necessary to make the preliminary determination. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Notice of preliminary determination. new text end new text begin The office must send notice of the preliminary determination to the complainant and the filer in the manner described under section 300.72. Notice is deemed received in the manner described under section 300.72. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Response. new text end new text begin After notice is received, the nonprevailing party must respond to the preliminary determination within ten calendar days with additional information or evidence in support of the nonprevailing party's position. The prevailing party may send additional information or evidence within the same time period. The response must be received by the office within the time period provided under this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Procedure if no second response is received. new text end new text begin If the nonprevailing party does not respond as required under subdivision 3, the preliminary determination becomes final and the office must issue a final order under section 300.76. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Procedure if second response is received. new text end new text begin If the nonprevailing party responds as required under subdivision 3, the office must consider the additional information provided, make a final determination regarding whether the filing named in the declaration is fraudulent, and issue a final order under section 300.76. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Factors. new text end new text begin When making a preliminary or final determination under this section, the office may consider various factors, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) whether the office has previously received declarations of wrongful filing or issued final orders relating to the business, the filer, or the complainant; new text end new text begin (2) the previous filing history relating to the business, the filer, or the complainant; new text end new text begin (3) whether the filer or complainant failed to respond to a request for additional information; and new text end new text begin (4) whether the office is able to independently verify the information provided by the filer or complainant using publicly available information. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin [300.76] FINAL ORDER. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Filings deemed fraudulent. new text end new text begin (a) If the office deems a filing fraudulent under section 300.74 or 300.75, the office must issue a final order under this subdivision. The final order must provide the office's rationale for deeming the filing fraudulent. new text end new text begin (b) When a filing is deemed fraudulent pursuant to a final order under this subdivision, the filing must be treated for legal purposes as if the filing never existed. In the case of a business registered using a Minnesota resident's name, address, or identity without the resident's authorization, the business is deemed dissolved. new text end new text begin (c) When a filing is deemed fraudulent pursuant to a final order, the office must: new text end new text begin (1) mark the unauthorized filing or the business record as unauthorized or fraudulent; new text end new text begin (2) redact names and addresses that were used without authorization; and new text end new text begin (3) retain a copy of the final order. new text end new text begin (d) In addition to the actions in paragraph (c), the office may: new text end new text begin (1) disable additional filing functionality on the business entity's record; or new text end new text begin (2) take other action the office deems necessary to prevent further unauthorized filings, protect private information, or prevent misuse of unauthorized information. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Filings deemed not fraudulent or insufficient evidence. new text end new text begin If the office determines that a filing is not fraudulent or that insufficient information is available to make a determination, the office must issue a final order stating that the office is not removing the filing from the database. The final order must provide the office's rationale for determining that the filing is not fraudulent or that insufficient information is available to make a determination. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin [300.77] JUDICIAL REVIEW. new text end new text begin (a) Any party who is aggrieved by a final order under section 300.76 may appeal the order to the district court of the Minnesota county where the business that is the subject of the final order is registered or was registered before the business's dissolution or, if the business is not registered in Minnesota, to the district court of Ramsey County. The aggrieved party may also appeal the final order as part of any district court action between the filer and complainant where the filing at issue is relevant to the issues in the case. new text end new text begin (b) The aggrieved party must serve a written copy of a notice of appeal upon the office and any adverse party of record within 30 calendar days after the date the final order was issued and must also file the original notice and proof of service with the court administrator of the district court. Service may be made in person or by mail. Service by mail is complete upon mailing. The court administrator is prohibited from requiring a filing fee for appeals taken pursuant to this section. new text end new text begin (c) The office may elect to become a party to the proceedings in the district court. new text end new text begin (d) The court may order that the office furnish the court and all parties to the proceedings with a copy of the decision, the filing that is the subject of the decision, and any materials or information submitted to the office. Any materials provided under this section that are filed with the court must be done so under restricted access unless the court orders otherwise. new text end new text begin (e) A party may obtain a hearing at a special term of the district court by serving a written notice of the hearing's time and place at least ten days before the date of the hearing. new text end new text begin (f) A party aggrieved by the order of the district court may appeal the order as in other civil cases. Costs or disbursements must not be taxed against a party. A filing fee or bond must not be required of a party. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin [300.78] DATA PRACTICES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "nonpublic data" has the meaning given in section 13.02, subdivision 9, and "private data on individuals" has the meaning given in section 13.02, subdivision 12. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Data classification. new text end new text begin Data submitted by a complainant or filer under sections 300.70 to 300.78 is classified as nonpublic data or private data on individuals. A final order under section 300.76 is public data, subject to the following: the complainant or filer's personal contact information is classified as private data on individuals. The unredacted version of a filing deemed fraudulent pursuant to a final order under section 300.76, subdivision 1, is classified as nonpublic data or private data on individuals. The version of the filing that has been redacted pursuant to section 300.76, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), is classified as public data. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Dissemination permitted. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding subdivision 2, the office may disseminate data of any classification collected, created, or maintained under sections 300.70 to 300.78: new text end new text begin (1) to the attorney general to aid the office in the investigation and review of a filing that is the subject of a declaration of wrongful filing; new text end new text begin (2) to a person or agency if the office determines that access to the data aids a criminal or civil investigation; or new text end new text begin (3) if required or authorized by a court order or other state or federal law. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin [300.79] PROHIBITION ON DECEPTIVE BUSINESS MAILINGS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "solicitation" means a communication that is sent by a nongovernment third party to a business and that purports to: new text end new text begin (1) notify the business of an operating requirement, including but not limited to filing documents with or retrieving documents from the Office of the Secretary of State; or new text end new text begin (2) offer a service that relates to filing documents with, producing documents for, or reporting information to the Office of the Secretary of State. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Design and content requirements. new text end new text begin (a) A solicitation must: new text end new text begin (1) include a clear statement indicating that the solicitation is an advertisement and is not from a government agency. The statement must be placed at the top of a physical document or the beginning of an electronic communication and must be in at least 24-point font. All other text in the document must be smaller than the statement required by this clause; new text end new text begin (2) provide information indicating where an individual is able to directly file documents with the secretary of state or retrieve copies of public records; new text end new text begin (3) disclose the name and physical address of the company sending the solicitation. The physical address must not be a post office box; and new text end new text begin (4) for a mailed solicitation, prominently display in capital letters on the envelope or outer wrapper the words "THIS IS NOT A GOVERNMENT DOCUMENT." new text end new text begin (b) The overall design and language of a solicitation must not: new text end new text begin (1) create the impression that the solicitation is an official government notice or document; new text end new text begin (2) incorporate the Minnesota state seal or other logo or branding of the state or any state agency; or new text end new text begin (3) indicate or imply a legal duty to act on the solicitation or a penalty for failure to act on the solicitation. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin (a) A person who sends a solicitation that does not comply with the requirements of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (b) A violation of this section is a violation of sections 325D.43 to 325D.48. new text end Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.48, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Acts constituting. Whoever makes a false material statement not believing it to be true in any of the following cases is guilty of perjury and may be sentenced as provided in subdivision 4: (1) in or for an action, hearing or proceeding of any kind in which the statement is required or authorized by law to be made under oath or affirmation; (2) in any writing which is required or authorized by law to be under oath or affirmation; (3) in any writing made according to section 358.115; (4) in any writing made according to section 358.116; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (5)new text begin in any writing made according to sections 300.70 to 300.78; ornew text end new text begin (6)new text end in any other case in which the penalties for perjury are imposed by law and no specific sentence is otherwise provided. Sec. 15. new text begin RULEMAKING.new text end new text begin The secretary of state may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this article. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 14.125, no time limit applies to the authority granted under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 16. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Sections 2 to 12 and 14 are effective for filings made on or after January 1, 2026. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: H2783-1 16A.90 EMPLOYEE GAINSHARING SYSTEM. Subdivision 1. Commissioner must establish program. (a) The commissioner shall establish a program to provide onetime bonus compensation to state employees for efforts made to reduce the costs of operating state government or for ways of providing better or more efficient state services. The commissioner may authorize an executive branch appointing authority to make a onetime award to an employee or group of employees whose suggestion or involvement in a project is determined by the commissioner to have resulted in documented cost-savings to the state. Before authorizing awards under this section, the commissioner shall establish guidelines for the program including but not limited to: (1) the maximum award is ten percent of the documented savings in the first fiscal year in which the savings are realized up to $50,000; (2) the award must be paid from the appropriation to which the savings accrued; and (3) employees whose primary job responsibility is to identify cost savings or ways of providing better or more efficient state services are generally not eligible for bonus compensation under this section except in extraordinary circumstances as defined by the commissioner. (b) The program required by this section must be in addition to any existing monetary or nonmonetary performance-based recognition programs for state employees, including achievement awards, continuous improvement awards, and general employee recognitions. Subd. 2. Biannual legislative report. No later than August 1, 2017, and biannually thereafter, the commissioner must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate committees with jurisdiction over Minnesota Management and Budget on the status of the program required by this section. The report must detail: (1) the specific program guidelines established by the commissioner as required by subdivision 1, if the guidelines have not been described in a previous report; (2) any proposed modifications to the established guidelines under consideration by the commissioner, including the reason for the proposed modifications; (3) the methods used by the commissioner to promote the program to state employees, if the methods have not been described in a previous report; (4) a summary of the results of the program that includes the following, categorized by agency: (i) the number of state employees whose suggestions or involvement in a project were considered for possible bonus compensation, and a description of each suggestion or project that was considered; (ii) the total amount of bonus compensation actually awarded, itemized by each suggestion or project that resulted in an award and the amount awarded for that suggestion or project; and (iii) the total amount of documented cost-savings that accrued to the agency as a result of each suggestion or project for which bonus compensation was granted; and (5) any recommendations for legislation that, in the judgment of the commissioner, would improve the effectiveness of the bonus compensation program established by this section or which would otherwise increase opportunities for state employees to actively participate in the development and implementation of strategies for reducing the costs of operating state government or for providing better or more efficient state services. 16B.356 DEFINITIONS. Subdivision 1. Terms. For the purposes of sections 16B.356 to 16B.359, the terms defined in this section have the meanings given. Subd. 2. Council. "Council" means the Minnesota Advisory Council on Infrastructure established in section 16B.357. Subd. 3. Infrastructure. "Infrastructure" means physical structures and facilities, including but not limited to property, lands, buildings, and other assets of a capital nature. The term includes infrastructure related to agriculture, commerce, communications, economic development, energy, food, health, housing, natural resources, public safety, transportation, drinking water, stormwater, and wastewater. 16B.357 MINNESOTA ADVISORY COUNCIL ON INFRASTRUCTURE. Subdivision 1. Establishment; purpose. (a) The Minnesota Advisory Council on Infrastructure is established as provided under sections 16B.356 to 16B.359. (b) The purpose of the council is to define and maintain a vision for the future of Minnesota's infrastructure that provides for its proper management, coordination, and investment. Subd. 2. Voting membership. The council consists of the following voting members: (1) two members appointed by the governor; (2) two members appointed by the senate majority leader; (3) two members appointed by the senate minority leader; (4) two members appointed by the speaker of the house; (5) two members appointed by the house minority leader; and (6) one member appointed by the Indian Affairs Council. Subd. 3. Nonvoting membership. The council consists of the following nonvoting members: (1) the commissioner of administration; (2) the commissioner of agriculture; (3) the commissioner of commerce; (4) the commissioner of employment and economic development; (5) the commissioner of health; (6) the commissioner of management and budget; (7) the commissioner of natural resources; (8) the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency; (9) the commissioner of transportation; (10) the commissioner of Iron Range resources and rehabilitation; (11) the chair of the Metropolitan Council; (12) the chair of the Board of Water and Soil Resources; (13) the executive director of the Minnesota Public Facilities Authority; (14) the chancellor of Minnesota State Colleges and Universities; and (15) the president of the University of Minnesota. Subd. 4. Voting members; appointment requirements. (a) An appointing authority under subdivision 2 may only appoint an individual who has direct and practical expertise and experience, whether from the public or private sector, in any of the following: (1) asset management in one or more of the areas of planning, design, construction, management, or operations and maintenance, for: (i) drinking water; (ii) wastewater; (iii) stormwater; (iv) transportation; (v) energy; or (vi) communications; (2) financial management and procurement; or (3) regional asset management across jurisdictions and infrastructure sectors. (b) Each appointing authority under subdivision 2, clauses (1) to (5), must appoint one individual who resides in a metropolitan county, as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 4, and one individual who resides outside of a metropolitan county. (c) No current legislator may be appointed to the council. (d) Prior to making appointments, the appointing authorities under subdivision 2 must coordinate and provide for: (1) geographic representation throughout the state; (2) representation for all major types of infrastructure assets; and (3) representation from the public and private sectors. Subd. 5. Voting members; recommendations for appointment. Each appointing authority under subdivision 2 must acknowledge and give consideration to appointment recommendations made by interested stakeholders, including but not limited to: (1) the Association of Minnesota Counties; (2) the League of Minnesota Cities; (3) the Coalition of Greater Minnesota Cities; (4) the Minnesota Association of Townships; (5) the Minnesota Chapter of the American Public Works Association; (6) the Associated General Contractors of Minnesota; (7) a labor union representing the building trades; (8) a public utility; (9) the Minnesota Municipal Utilities Association; (10) the Minnesota Chamber of Commerce; (11) the Minnesota section of the American Water Works Association; (12) the Minnesota Rural Water Association; and (13) the Minnesota Rural Electric Association. Subd. 6. Nonvoting members; delegation. (a) Notwithstanding section 15.06, subdivision 6, an individual specified under subdivision 3 may appoint a designee to serve on the council only as provided in this subdivision. (b) An individual specified under subdivision 3 may appoint a designee who serves on an ongoing basis to exercise the powers and duties as a nonvoting council member under this section. The designation must be made by written order, filed with the secretary of state. The designee must be a public employee who is: (1) a deputy commissioner or deputy director; (2) an assistant commissioner; (3) an immediate subordinate of the appointing authority; (4) a director of a relevant office; or (5) if the appointing authority is the chair of a board or council specified under subdivision 3, another member of that board or council. Subd. 7. Officers. (a) The council must elect from among its voting members a chair, or cochairs, and vice-chair. As necessary, the council may elect other council members to serve as officers. (b) The chair is responsible for convening meetings of the council and setting each meeting agenda. Subd. 8. Council actions. (a) A majority of the council, including voting and nonvoting members and excluding vacancies, is a quorum. (b) The council may conduct business as provided under section 13D.015. Subd. 9. Compensation; terms; removal; vacancies. The compensation, membership terms, filling of vacancies, and removal of members on the council are as provided in section 15.0575. Subd. 10. Open Meeting Law. The council is subject to the Minnesota Open Meeting Law under chapter 13D. Subd. 11. Data practices. The council is subject to the Minnesota Data Practices Act under chapter 13. 16B.358 POWERS; RESPONSIBILITIES AND DUTIES. Subdivision 1. General powers. The council has the nonregulatory powers necessary to carry out its responsibilities and duties specified by law. Subd. 2. General responsibilities. (a) The council is responsible for activities in a nonregulatory capacity and in coordination with stakeholders to identify and recommend best practices that: (1) preserve and extend the longevity of Minnesota's public and privately owned infrastructure; and (2) provide for effective and efficient management of infrastructure. (b) Unless specifically provided otherwise, nothing in sections 16B.356 to 16B.359 requires transfer of personnel, specific responsibilities, or administrative functions from a department or agency to the council. Subd. 3. Duties. The duties of the council are to: (1) identify approaches to enhance and expedite infrastructure coordination across jurisdictions, agencies, state and local government, and public and private sectors, including in planning, design, engineering, construction, maintenance, and operations; (2) analyze methods to improve efficiency and the use of resources related to (i) public infrastructure, and (ii) public asset management practices; (3) identify opportunities to reduce duplication in infrastructure projects and asset management; (4) identify barriers and gaps in effective asset management; (5) identify objectives and strategies that enhance the longevity and adaptability of infrastructure throughout the state; (6) develop advisory recommendations, if any, related to the responsibilities and duties specified under this section, including to state agencies for programs, policies, and practices; and (7) implement the requirements under sections 16B.356 to 16B.359. Subd. 4. Asset managers program. The council must develop and recommend a plan for a statewide asset managers program that provides for: (1) identification, exchange, and distribution of (i) information on existing asset management tools and resources, and (ii) best practices on infrastructure management; (2) training for infrastructure owners and asset managers; and (3) coordination and collaboration among infrastructure owners and asset managers. Subd. 5. Administrative support. The commissioner must provide the council with suitable space to maintain an office, hold meetings, and keep records. The commissioner must provide administrative staff and information technology resources to the council as necessary for the expeditious conduct of the council's duties and responsibilities. Subd. 6. Report. By December 15 annually, the council must submit a report to the governor and the legislative committees with jurisdiction over capital investment, climate, economic development, energy, and transportation. At a minimum, the report must: (1) summarize the activities of the council; (2) provide an overview for each of the duties and requirements under sections 16B.356 to 16B.359; (3) identify any barriers and constraints related to activities of the council; and (4) provide any recommendations of the council. 16B.359 PERSONNEL. Subdivision 1. Executive director. (a) The commissioner must hire an executive director in the classified service, with the advice of the council. The executive director is the principal administrative officer for the council. The executive director is not an ex officio member of the council. (b) The executive director must have (1) leadership or management experience, and (2) training and experience in public works or asset management. (c) The executive director must perform the duties as specified by the council to manage and implement the requirements of sections 16B.356 to 16B.359. Subd. 2. Staffing. (a) The executive director must: (1) hire any employees on the basis of merit and fitness that the executive director considers necessary to discharge the functions of the office; and (2) prescribe the powers and duties of an employee. (b) The executive director may: (1) hire a deputy director and other staff; and (2) delegate the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the executive director to employees, under conditions prescribed by the executive director. 609.466 MEDICAL ASSISTANCE FRAUD. Any person who, with the intent to defraud, presents a claim for reimbursement, a cost report or a rate application, relating to the payment of medical assistance funds pursuant to chapter 256B, to the state agency, which is false in whole or in part, is guilty of an attempt to commit theft of public funds and may be sentenced accordingly. Repealed Minnesota Rule: H2783-1 1105.7900 SUBSTANTIAL EQUIVALENCY. § D. Individuals required by Minnesota Statutes, section 326A.14, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), to obtain a verification that their individual qualifications are substantially equivalent to the licensure requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 326A.03, subdivisions 3, 4, and 6, shall obtain the verification from the NASBA National Qualification Appraisal Service prior to rendering professional services in this state. Documentation supporting this verification must be maintained by the individual for a minimum period of six years and must be submitted to the board upon request.